Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.025

State grass.

Agropyron spicatum, the species of natural grass commonly called "bluebunch wheatgrass," is hereby designated as the official grass of the state of Washington.

[ 1989 c 354 s 62.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.